Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.300

Actions or claims arising from construction, alteration, repair, design, planning, survey, engineering, etc., of improvements upon real property.

RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person having constructed, altered or repaired any improvement upon real property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning, surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or supervision or observation of construction, or administration of construction contracts for any construction, alteration or repair of any improvement upon real property. This section is specifically intended to benefit persons having performed work for which the persons must be registered or licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020, 18.43.040, 18.96.020, or 19.28.041, and shall not apply to claims or causes of action against persons not required to be so registered or licensed.

[ 2004 c 257 s 1; 1986 c 305 s 703; 1967 c 75 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—2004 c 257: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2004 c 257 s 2.]

Preamble—Report to legislature—Applicability—Severability—1986 c 305: See notes following RCW 4.16.160.